District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.07

Public education program.

The Chief shall carry on a suitable publicity program designed to inform the citizens of the District of the provisions of this unit and the rights and obligations created by it.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 707, 23 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2377.
1973 Ed., § 6-1877.